New Jersey, session 221, A2052.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 4 of P.L.2007, c.137 (C.52:18A-238) is amended to read as follows: 4.    The development authority shall have the following powers: a.     To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business; b.    To adopt and have a seal and to alter the same at pleasure; c.     To sue and be sued; d.    To acquire in the name of the development authority by purchase or otherwise, on such terms and conditions and such manner as it may deem proper, or by the exercise of the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by the "Eminent Domain Act of 1971," P.L.1971, c.361 (C.20:3-1 et seq.), any lands or interests therein or other property which it may determine is reasonably necessary for any school facilities project; e.     To enter into contracts with a person upon such terms and conditions as the development authority shall determine to be reasonable, including, but not limited to, for the planning, design, construction, reconstruction, improvement, equipping, furnishing, operation and maintenance of a school facilities project and the reimbursement thereof, and to pay or compromise any claims arising therefrom; f.     To sell, convey or lease to any person all or any portion of its property, for such consideration and upon such terms as the development authority may determine to be reasonable; g.    To mortgage, pledge or assign or otherwise encumber all or any portion of any property or revenues, whenever it shall find such action to be in furtherance of the purposes of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.) and P.L.2007, c.137 (C.52:18A-235 et al.); h.    To grant options to purchase or renew a lease for any of its property on such terms as the development authority may determine to be reasonable; i.     To contract for and to accept any gifts or grants or loans of funds or property or financial or other aid in any form from the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or from the State or any agency, instrumentality or political subdivision thereof, or from any other source and to comply, subject to the provisions of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.) and P.L.2007, c.137 (C.52:18A-235 et al.), with the terms and conditions thereof; j.     In connection with any application for assistance under P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.) or P.L.2007, c.137 (C.52:18A-235 et al.) or commitments therefor, to require and collect such fees and charges as the development authority shall determine to be reasonable; k.    To adopt, amend and repeal regulations to carry out the provisions of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.) and P.L.2007, c.137 (C.52:18A-235 et al.); l.     To acquire, purchase, manage and operate, hold and dispose of real and personal property or interests therein, take assignments of rentals and leases and make and enter into all contracts, leases, agreements and arrangements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties; m.   To purchase, acquire and take assignments of notes, mortgages and other forms of security and evidences of indebtedness; n.    To purchase, acquire, attach, seize, accept or take title to any property by conveyance or by foreclosure, and sell, lease, manage or operate any property for a use specified in P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.) and P.L.2007, c.137 (C.52:18A-235 et al.); o.    To employ consulting engineers, architects, attorneys, real estate counselors, appraisers, and such other consultants and employees as may be required in the judgment of the development authority to carry out the purposes of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.) and P.L.2007, c.137 (C.52:18A-235 et al.) and to fix and pay their compensation from funds available to the development authority therefor, all without regard to the provisions of Title 11A of the New Jersey Statutes; except that the Civil Service Commission shall exercise authority over human resource management for such employees, which shall include, but not be limited to, the process for hiring the employees and terminating their employment, and orienting, training, counseling, and appraising the employees, and pursuant to which authority the Civil Service Commission shall adopt regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.); p.    To do and perform any acts and things authorized by P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.) and P.L.2007, c.137 (C.52:18A-235 et al.) under, through or by means of its own officers, agents and employees, or by contract with any person; q.    To procure insurance against any losses in connection with its property, operations or assets in such amounts and from such insurers as it deems desirable; r.     To do any and all things necessary or convenient to carry out its purposes and exercise the powers given and granted in P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.) and P.L.2007, c.137 (C.52:18A-235 et al.); s.     To construct, reconstruct, rehabilitate, improve, alter, equip, maintain or repair or provide for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, alteration, equipping or maintenance or repair of any property and lot, award and enter into construction contracts, purchase orders and other contracts with respect thereto, upon such terms and conditions as the development authority shall determine to be reasonable, including, but not limited to, reimbursement for the planning, designing, construction, reconstruction, improvement, equipping, furnishing, operation and maintenance of any such property and the settlement of any claims arising therefrom; t.     To undertake school facilities projects and to enter into agreements or contracts, execute instruments, and do and perform all acts or things necessary, convenient or desirable for the purposes of the development authority to carry out any power expressly provided pursuant to P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.) or P.L.2007, c.137 (C.52:18A-235 et al.), including, but not limited to, entering into contracts with the State Treasurer, the New Jersey Economic Development Authority, the Commissioner of Education, districts, and any other entity which may be required in order to carry out the provisions of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.) or P.L.2007, c.137 (C.52:18A-235 et al.); u.    To enter into leases, rentals or other disposition of a real property interest in and of any school facilities project to or from any local unit pursuant to P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.) or P.L.2007, c.137 (C.52:18A-235 et al.); v.    To make and contract to make loans or leases to local units to finance the cost of school facilities projects and to acquire and contract to acquire bonds, notes or other obligations issued or to be issued by local units to evidence the loans or leases, all in accordance with the provisions of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.) and P.L.2007, c.137 (C.52:18A-235 et al.); w.   To charge to and collect from local units, the State, and any other person, any fees and charges in connection with the development authority's actions undertaken with respect to school facilities projects including, but not limited to, fees and charges for the development authority's administrative, organization, insurance, operating and other expenses incident to the planning, design, construction and placing into service and maintenance of school facilities projects. (cf: P.L.2007, c.137, s.4) 2.    This act shall take effect on January 1 next following enactment.